New York, session 2025-2026, A723.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1266-n to read as follows: 3 § 1266-n. Air quality monitors in subway stations. 1. The authority 4 shall install air quality monitors inside every subway station and real 5 time data from each air quality monitor shall be accessible to the 6 public on its website and in the station in which the air quality moni- 7 tor is located. 8 2. The air quality monitors shall analyze air quality on at least ten 9 separate occasions per day in the subway station in which they are 10 located for the presence of fine particulates, with the air quality 11 being analyzed at least twice during the periods when there is peak 12 ridership during the morning and evening commutes. 13 3. If an air quality monitor indicates that the air quality exceeds 14 safe levels for fine particulates, as determined by the United States 15 environmental protection agency, the authority shall take immediate 16 remedial action to improve air quality, including but not limited to, 17 installing air filters and/or fans. 18 4. The authority in consultation with the department of health shall 19 determine the cost of installing subway platform screen doors in subway 20 stations with the worst air quality as determined by the air quality 21 monitors installed pursuant to the provisions of this section. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 23 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02263-01-5